Missouri, session 2026, HB2156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 21.795, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 21.795 and 142.805, to read as follows:
21.795. 1. There is established a permanent joint committee of the general assembly
to be known as the "Joint Committee on Transportation Oversight" to be composed of seven
members of the standing transportation committees of both the senate and the house of
representatives and three nonvoting ex officio members. Of the fourteen members to be
appointed to the joint committee, the seven senate members of the joint committee shall be
appointed by the president pro tem of the senate and minority leader of the senate and the
seven house members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and
the minority floor leader of the house of representatives. The seven senate members shall be
composed, as nearly as may be, of majority and minority party members in the same
proportion as the number of majority and minority party members in the senate bears to the
total membership of the senate. No major party shall be represented by more than four
members from the house of representatives. The ex officio members shall be the state
auditor, the director of the oversight division of the committee on legislative research, and the
commissioner of the office of administration or the designee of such auditor, director or
commissioner. The joint committee shall be chaired jointly by both chairs of the senate and
house transportation committees. A majority of the committee shall constitute a quorum, but
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2156 2
the concurrence of a majority of the members, other than the ex officio members, shall be
required for the determination of any matter within the committee's duties.
2. The department of transportation shall submit a written report prior to December
thirty-first of each year to the governor and the lieutenant governor. The report shall be
posted to the department's internet website so that general assembly members may elect to
access a copy of the report electronically. The written report shall contain the following:
(1) A comprehensive financial report of all funds for the preceding state fiscal year
which shall include a report by independent certified public accountants, selected by the
commissioner of the office of administration, attesting that the financial statements present
fairly the financial position of the department in conformity with generally accepted
government accounting principles;
(2) A copy of the department's most current and annual publication titled "Citizen's
Guide to Transportation Funding in Missouri";
(3) A copy of the department's most current and annual publication titled "Financial
Snapshot - An appendix to the Citizen's Guide to Transportation Funding in Missouri",
including a summary of the department's external expenditures and internal
expenditures, as such term is defined under section 142.805;
(4) A copy of the department's most current and annual publication titled "MoDOT
Results: Accountability. Innovation. Efficiency.".
3. Prior to February fifteenth of each year, the committee shall hold an annual
meeting and call before its members, officials or employees of the state highways and
transportation commission or department of transportation, as determined by the committee,
for the sole purpose of receiving and examining the report required pursuant to subsection 2
of this section. The committee shall not have the power to modify projects or priorities of the
state highways and transportation commission or department of transportation. The
committee may make recommendations to the state highways and transportation commission
or the department of transportation. Disposition of those recommendations shall be reported
by the commission or the department to the joint committee on transportation oversight.
4. In addition to the annual meeting required by subsection 3 of this section, the
committee shall meet two times each year. The co-chairs of the committee shall establish an
agenda for each meeting that may include, but not be limited to, the following items to be
discussed with the committee members throughout the year during the scheduled meeting:
(1) Presentation of a prioritized plan for all modes of transportation;
(2) Discussion of department efficiencies and expenditure of cost-savings within the
department;

HB 2156 3
(3) Presentation of a status report on department of transportation revenues and
expenditures, including a detailed summary of projects funded by new state revenue as
provided in paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section; and
(4) Implementation of any actions as may be deemed necessary by the committee as
authorized by law. The co-chairs of the committee may call special meetings of the
committee with ten days' notice to the members of the committee, the director of the
department of transportation, and the department of transportation.
5. The committee shall also review all applications for the development of specialty
plates submitted to it by the department of revenue. The committee shall approve such
application by a majority vote. The committee shall approve any application unless the
committee receives:
(1) A signed petition from five house members or two senators that they are opposed
to the approval of the proposed license plate and the reason for such opposition;
(2) Notification that the organization seeking authorization to establish a new
specialty license plate has not met all the requirements of section 301.3150;
(3) A proposed new specialty license plate containing objectionable language or
design;
(4) A proposed license plate not meeting the requirements of any reason promulgated
by rule.

The committee shall notify the director of the department of revenue upon approval or denial
of an application for the development of a specialty plate.
6. The committee shall submit records of its meetings to the secretary of the senate
and the chief clerk of the house of representatives in accordance with sections 610.020 and
610.023.
142.805. 1. As used in this section, the term "internal expenditures" shall mean
any funds expended by the department of transportation for the purpose of internal
functions including, but not limited to, employee salaries and benefits, post-employment
benefits, program distributions to other state agencies and universities, and
administrative costs.
2. (1) For each fiscal year that the department of transportation's internal
expenditures exceed twenty percent of the department of transportation’s total
expenditures, as reported in the annual report required under section 21.795, the
motor fuel tax authorized under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 142.803 shall
be reduced by one-half cent per gallon for the following fiscal year.

HB 2156 4
(2) Such a reduction shall not reduce the rate of motor fuel tax by more than one
and one-half cents per gallon below the rate of motor fuel tax authorized under
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 142.803 in effect as of August 28, 2026.
3. In any fiscal year following a rate reduction under subsection 2 of this section,
if the department of transportation's internal expenditures are less than twenty percent
of the department of transportation's total expenditures, as reported in the annual
report required under section 21.795, the motor fuel tax rate in effect for such fiscal
year shall be increased by one-half cent per gallon or increased up to the total rate
authorized by subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 142.803 in effect as of August 28,
2026, whichever is less, for the following fiscal year.
4. The department of revenue, in consultation with the department of
transportation, may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔